Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-608
Ground water; conservation; declaration of policy.

The Legislature finds, recognizes, and declares that the conservation of ground water and the beneficial use thereof are essential to the future well-being of this state, that the drilling of irrigation water wells in the state without regard to spacing is detrimental to the public welfare, and that the spacing of irrigation water wells should be regulated.

Laws 1957, c. 201, § 1, p. 704;

Laws 1993, LB 131, § 7.